Illinois, session 104th, HB1632.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act is 5amended by changing Section 18 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 333/18)7    Sec. 18. Acceptance and distribution of electronic records 8by governmental agencies. 9    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 12(f), each 10governmental agency of this State shall determine whether, and 11the extent to which, it will send and accept electronic 12records and electronic signatures to and from other persons 13and otherwise create, generate, communicate, store, process, 14use, and rely upon electronic records and electronic 15signatures.16    (b) To the extent that a governmental agency uses 17electronic records and electronic signatures under subsection 18(a), the governmental agency, giving due consideration to 19security, may Department of Innovation and Technology and the 20Secretary of State, pursuant to their rulemaking authority 21under other law and giving due consideration to security, 22shall, no later than 6 months after the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly, adopt   HB1632 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 03523 BDA 13546 b1administrative rules that specify:2        (1) the manner and format in which the electronic 3    records must be created, generated, sent, communicated, 4    received, and stored and the systems established for those 5    purposes;6        (2) if electronic records must be signed by electronic 7    means, the type of electronic signature required, the 8    manner and format in which the electronic signature must 9    be affixed to the electronic record, and the identity of, 10    or criteria that must be met by, any third party used by a 11    person filing a document to facilitate the process;12        (3) control processes and procedures as appropriate to 13    ensure adequate preservation, disposition, integrity, 14    security, confidentiality, and auditability of electronic 15    records; and16        (4) any other required attributes for electronic 17    records which are specified for corresponding 18    nonelectronic records or reasonably necessary under the 19    circumstances.20    (b-5) Pursuant to their rulemaking authority under other 21laws, the Secretary of State and the Department of Innovation 22and Technology may adopt rules setting forth their respective 23minimum requirements under subsection (b) of this Section. Any 24rules adopted by the Secretary of State under this subsection 25shall only apply with respect to the Secretary of State and any 26rules adopted by the Department of Innovation and Technology   HB1632 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 03523 BDA 13546 b1under this subsection shall only apply with respect to client 2agencies, as that term is defined in the Department of 3Innovation and Technology Act. 4    (c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 12(f), this 5Act does not require a governmental agency of this State to use 6or permit the use of electronic records or electronic 7signatures.8(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 103-390, eff. 7-28-23.)